Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-573
Class V school district; school board; president; duties.

The president of the school board of a Class V school district shall preside at all meetings of the board, appoint all committees when appointment is not otherwise provided for, and sign all warrants ordered by the board to be drawn upon the treasurer of the school district for school money.

Laws 1891, c. 45, § 9, p. 320;

R.S.1913, § 7017;

C.S.1922, § 6648;

C.S.1929, § 79-2711;

R.S.1943, § 79-2712;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 257, p. 777;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1004.01;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 326;

Laws 2001, LB 797, § 15.